New Jersey, session 222, S3551.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1983, c.571 (C.54A:6-21) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Contributions to certain employee trusts. Gross income shall not include amounts contributed by an employer on behalf of and at the election of an employee: a.     to a trust which is part of a qualified cash or deferred arrangement which meets the requirements of [Section 401(k)] subsection (k) of section 401 of the [1954] federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.401, as amended; b.    for annuity contracts, or treated as amounts contributed for annuity contracts, under the provisions of subsection (b) of section 403 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. s.403. (cf: P.L.1983, c.571, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 following enactment.